Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.200

Order for survey of property.

The court or judge thereof, on motion, and after notice to the adverse party, may, for cause shown, grant an order allowing the party applying therefor to enter upon the property in controversy and make survey and admeasurement thereof, for the purposes of the action.

[Code 1881 s 543; 1877 p 114 s 547; 1869 p 130 s 495; RRS s 801.]